Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.010

Findings.

The legislature finds that in order to comply with the federal older Americans act and to effectively assist residents, patients, and clients of long-term care facilities in the assertion of their civil and human rights, a long-term care ombuds program should be instituted.

[ 2013 c 23 s 88; 1983 c 290 s 1.]